fst/verb_paradigms.lexc
! 95 — aistwei (present) stem='āist'
LEXICON V95_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 95 — aistwei (preterite) stem='āisa'
LEXICON V95_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:āisa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:āisa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:āisa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:āisa  # ;

! 96 — grīmztwei (present) stem='grīmzd'
LEXICON V96_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 96 — grīmztwei (preterite) stem='grīmza'
LEXICON V96_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:grīmza  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:grīmza  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:grīmza  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:grīmza  # ;

! 97 — etmīntun (present) stem='etmenn'
LEXICON V97_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 97 — etmīntun (preterite) stem='etminna'
LEXICON V97_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:etminna  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:etminna  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:etminna  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:etminna  # ;

! 98 — grīnstun (present) stem='grēnd'
LEXICON V98_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 98 — grīnstun (preterite) stem='grīnda'
LEXICON V98_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:grīnda  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:grīnda  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:grīnda  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:grīnda  # ;

! 99 — swigtwei (present) stem='swēig'
LEXICON V99_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 99 — swigtwei (preterite) stem='swigga'
LEXICON V99_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:swigga  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:swigga  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:swigga  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:swigga  # ;

! 100 — kwistun (present) stem='kwēit'
LEXICON V100_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 100 — kwistun (preterite) stem='kwitta'
LEXICON V100_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:kwitta  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:kwitta  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:kwitta  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:kwitta  # ;

! 102 — ristun (present) stem='rēis'
LEXICON V102_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 102 — ristun (preterite) stem='rissa'
LEXICON V102_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:rissa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:rissa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:rissa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:rissa  # ;

! 102a — listun (present) stem='lāis'
LEXICON V102a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 102a — listun (preterite) stem='lissa'
LEXICON V102a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:lissa  # ;

! 105 — wiptwei (present) stem='wepp'
LEXICON V105_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:elpa  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:elpa  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:elpa  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:elpimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:elpa  # ;

! 105 — wiptwei (preterite) stem='wippa'
LEXICON V105_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:wippa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:wippa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:wippa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:wippa  # ;

! 106a — grēitun (present) stem='grejj'
LEXICON V106a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 106a — grēitun (preterite) stem='grejja'
LEXICON V106a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:grejja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:grejja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:grejja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:grejja  # ;

! 106b — smeītwei (present) stem='smeī'
LEXICON V106b_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ja% si  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ja% si  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ja% si  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai% si  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei% si  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ja% si  # ;

! 106b — smeītwei (preterite) stem='smeīja'
LEXICON V106b_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:% si  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:% si  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:% si  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai% si  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei% si  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:% si  # ;

! 106c — sklāitwei (present) stem='sklajj'
LEXICON V106c_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 106c — sklāitwei (preterite) stem='sklajja'
LEXICON V106c_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:sklajja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:sklajja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:sklajja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:sklajja  # ;

! 107 — lītwei (present) stem='l'
LEXICON V107_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:īma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:īsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:īt  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:īmai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:ītei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:īt  # ;

! 107 — lītwei (preterite) stem='lijja'
LEXICON V107_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:lijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:līja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:lijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:līja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:lijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:līja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:līmai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:lītei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:lijja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:līja  # ;

! 108 — wītun (present) stem='weī'
LEXICON V108_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:wejja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:wejja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:wejja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:wejjimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:wejjitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:wejja  # ;

! 108 — wītun (preterite) stem='wijja'
LEXICON V108_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:wijja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:wijja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:wijja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:wijja  # ;

! 109 — wirtwei (present) stem='werd'
LEXICON V109_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 109 — wirtwei (preterite) stem='wirra'
LEXICON V109_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:wirra  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:wirra  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:wirra  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:wirra  # ;

! 110 — pastātwei (present) stem='pastān'
LEXICON V110_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:jimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:jitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 110 — pastātwei (preterite) stem='pastāi'
LEXICON V110_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:pastāi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:pastāi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:pastāi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:pastāi  # ;

! 111 — gaūtun (present) stem='gaūn'
LEXICON V111_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 111 — gaūtun (preterite) stem='gaūwa'
LEXICON V111_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:gaūwa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:gaūwa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:gaūwa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:gaūwa  # ;

! 112 — strūtun (present) stem='strāuj'
LEXICON V112_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 112 — strūtun (preterite) stem='struwwa'
LEXICON V112_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:struwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:struwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:struwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:struwwtei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:struwwa  # ;

! 113 — pūtun (present) stem='pūj'
LEXICON V113_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:pāuja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:pāuja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:pāuja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:pāujimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:pāujitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:pāuja  # ;

! 113 — pūtun (preterite) stem='pūwa'
LEXICON V113_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:pūwa  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:puwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:pūwa  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:puwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:pūwa  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:puwwa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:puwwamai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:puwwtei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:pūwa  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:puwwa  # ;

! 114 — wīrstwei (present) stem='wīrst'
LEXICON V114_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:wīrst  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:wīrst  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:wīrst  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:ei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:wīrst  # ;

! 114 — wīrstwei (preterite) stem='wīrta'
LEXICON V114_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:wīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:wīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:wīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:wīrta  # ;

! 115 — būtwei (present) stem='asma'
LEXICON V115_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:asma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:assei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ast  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:astei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ast  # ;

! 115 — būtwei (preterite) stem='bēi'
LEXICON V115_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:bēi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:bēi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:bēi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:bēi  # ;

! 116 — ēitwei (present) stem='ēima'
LEXICON V116_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ēima  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ēisei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ēit  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:ēitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ēit  # ;

! 116 — ēitwei (preterite) stem='gūbi'
LEXICON V116_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:gūbi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:gūbi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:gūbi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:gūbi  # ;

! 117 — īstun (present) stem='īma'
LEXICON V117_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:īma  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ēma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:īsei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ēsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:īst  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ēst  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:ēmai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:ītei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:ēstei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:īst  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ēst  # ;

! 117 — īstun (preterite) stem='īda'
LEXICON V117_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:īda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:ēda  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:īda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:ēda  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:īda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:ēda  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:ēdamai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:ēdatei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:īda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:ēda  # ;

! 118 — dātun (present) stem='dāma'
LEXICON V118_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:dāma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:dāsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:dāst  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:dātei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:dāstei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:dāst  # ;
